Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.160

Intercounty rural library districts—District treasurer.

The board of trustees of an intercounty rural library district shall designate the county treasurer of one of the counties included in the district to act as treasurer for the district. All moneys raised for the district by taxation within the participating counties or received by the district from any other sources shall be paid over to him or her, and he or she shall disburse the funds of the district upon warrants drawn thereon by the auditor of the county to which he or she belongs pursuant to vouchers approved by the trustees of the district.

[ 2011 c 336 s 701; 1947 c 75 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-8.]

NOTES:

Annual expenditures—Control of appropriations: RCW 27.12.240.